Hawaii statutes.
[§556A-14] Disclosure of digital assets to
conservator of protected person. (a) After an opportunity for a hearing
under section 560:5-410 or section 560:5-414, the court may grant a conservator
access to the digital assets of a protected person.

(b) Unless otherwise ordered by the court or
directed by the user, a custodian shall disclose to a conservator the catalogue
of electronic communications sent or received by a protected person and any
digital assets, other than the content of electronic communications, in which
the protected person has a right or interest if the conservator gives the
custodian:

(1) A written request for disclosure in physical or
electronic form;

(2) A certified copy of the court order that gives
the conservator authority over the digital assets of the protected person; and

(3) If requested by the custodian:

(A) A number, username, address, or other
unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify
the account of the protected person; or

(B) Evidence linking the account to the
protected person.

(c) A conservator with general authority to
manage the assets of a protected person may request a custodian of the digital
assets of the protected person to suspend or terminate an account of the protected
person for good cause. A request made under this section shall be accompanied
by a certified copy of the court order giving the conservator authority over
the protected person's property. [L 2016, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next